Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-207. Powers and duties of the division and commission generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer and enforce all laws and rules relating to solid waste disposal;

To advise, consult, and cooperate with appropriate federal, state, interstate, and local units of government and with affected groups and industries in the formation of plans and the implementation of a solid waste management program pursuant to this subchapter;

To accept and administer loans and grants from the United States Government and from such other sources as may be available to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for the planning, construction, and operation of solid waste management systems and disposal facilities;

To develop a statewide solid waste management plan in cooperation with municipal and county governments and solid waste boards which gives emphasis to regional planning, where feasible;

To require to be submitted and to approve plans and specifications for the construction and operation of solid waste disposal facilities and sites and to inspect the construction and operation thereof;

To issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny, under such conditions as the division may prescribe, permits for the establishment, construction, operation, or maintenance of solid waste management systems, disposal sites, and facilities;

To make investigations, inspections, and to hold such hearings, after notice, as the division may deem necessary or advisable for the discharge of duties under this subchapter and to ensure compliance with this subchapter and any orders and rules issued pursuant thereto;

To make, issue, modify, revoke, and enforce orders, after notice and opportunity for adjudicatory review by the commission, prohibiting violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter or of any rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, and to require the taking of such remedial measures for solid waste disposal as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the provisions and purposes of this subchapter;

To institute proceedings in the name of the division in any court of competent jurisdiction to compel compliance with and to restrain violation of the provisions of this subchapter or any rules and orders issued pursuant thereto and to require the taking of such remedial measures for solid waste disposal as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the provisions and purposes of this subchapter;

To initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration projects, and investigations and to coordinate with all state agency research programs pertaining to solid waste disposal and management systems;

To make periodic inspections of all solid waste facilities or locations permitted under this subchapter or the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq., to ensure compliance with all requirements of this subchapter and the rules promulgated under this subchapter and to make a final inspection of closed or abandoned solid waste disposal sites to determine compliance with rules for proper closure and proper filling and drainage of the site;

To issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny, under such conditions as the division may prescribe, permits for the establishment, construction, operation, or maintenance of transfer stations;

To regulate and license persons engaged in the business of transporting used and waste tires;

To establish minimum standards for the operation of a solid waste collection system; and

Upon the petition of a solid waste board or upon the division’s own initiative to revoke, modify, or deny a permit for a solid waste disposal facility or a permit for any other element of a solid waste management system based upon noncompliance with an approved regional solid waste management plan of a solid waste board.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Promulgation of rules implementing the substantive statutes charged to the division for administration.

In promulgation of such rules, prior to the submittal to public comment and review of any rule or change to any rule that is more stringent than federal requirements, the commission shall duly consider the economic impact and the environmental benefit of such rule on the people of the State of Arkansas, including those entities that will be subject to the rule.

The commission shall promptly initiate rulemaking proceedings to further implement the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

The extent of the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section shall be defined in the commission's rulemaking required under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section. It will include a written report which shall be available for public review along with the proposed rule in the public comment period.

Upon completion of the public comment period, the commission shall compile a rulemaking record or response to comments demonstrating a reasoned evaluation of the relative impact and benefits of the more stringent rule;

Promulgation of rules and procedures not otherwise governed by applicable law which the commission deems necessary to secure public participation in environmental decision-making processes;

Promulgation of rules governing administrative procedures for challenging or contesting division actions;

In the case of permitting or grants decisions, providing the right to appeal a permitting or grants decision rendered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her delegatee;

In the case of an administrative enforcement or emergency action, providing the right to contest any such action initiated by the director;

Instruct the director to prepare such reports or perform such studies as will advance the cause of environmental protection in the state;

Make recommendations to the director regarding overall policy and administration of the division, provided, however, that the director shall always remain within the plenary authority of the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment;

Upon a majority vote, initiate review of any director's decision;

To establish policies and standards for effective solid waste disposal and management systems; and

To adopt, after notice and public hearing, and to promulgate, modify, repeal, and enforce rules for the source reduction, minimization, recycling, collection, transportation, processing, storage, and disposal of solid wastes, including, but not limited to, the disposal site location and the construction, operation, and maintenance of the disposal site or disposal process as necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter and the powers and duties of the commission under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 7; 1983, No. 667, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2707; Acts 1991, No. 751, § 3; 1997, No. 1219, § 8; 1999, No. 1164, § 62; 2019, No. 315, §§ 531-537; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2600-2607; 2019, No. 980, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 315, § 533, amended subdivision (a)(11) of this section to replace “regulations” with “rules” in the former phrase “not less than quarterly in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission”. However, Acts 2019, No 980, § 1, specifically repealed this phrase.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “and rules”
for “rules and regulations” in (a)(7); deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(8), following the last occurrence of “rules” in (a)(11), and in (b)(1)(A), (b)(3), and (b)(10); deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(9) and (b)(2); substituted the first two occurrences of “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(11); rewrote (b)(1)(B); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(1)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a) and in (b)(4); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and added “and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment” in (b)(7).

The 2019 amendment by No. 980 substituted “inspections of all solid waste facilities or locations permitted under this subchapter or the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.” for “inspections not less than quarterly in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission of all solid waste disposal facilities or sites permitted under this subchapter” in (a)(11).

8-6-208. Existing rules, orders, etc.

All existing rules of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission relating to subjects embraced within this subchapter shall remain in full force and effect until expressly repealed, amended, or superseded by the commission.

All orders entered, permits granted, and pending legal proceedings instituted by the commission relating to subjects embraced within this subchapter shall remain unimpaired and in full force and effect until superseded by actions taken by the commission under this subchapter.

No existing civil or criminal remedies, public or private, for any wrongful action shall be excluded or impaired by this subchapter. Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to limit or supersede the provisions of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., or any action taken by the commission under the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2712; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 538.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

8-6-209. Local standards.

No municipality or county may, by ordinance, resolution, order, or otherwise, adopt standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities that are more restrictive than those adopted by, under, or pursuant to this subchapter or any and all applicable laws, rules, regulations, or orders adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under the provisions of this subchapter, or the regional solid waste management boards or districts, unless there exists a fully implemented comprehensive area-wide zoning plan, and corresponding laws or ordinances, covering the entire municipality or county.

Municipal or county ordinances, resolutions, or orders effective as of the date of the passage of this act and more restrictive than regional or state standards shall remain in full force and effect for a period of six (6) months following the date of the passage of this act.

Provided, also, that if a county or municipality adopts a comprehensive area-wide zoning plan and corresponding laws and ordinances covering the entire county or city as referred to in § 8-6-212(e), the county or city may incorporate existing ordinances, resolutions, or orders in that comprehensive area-wide zoning plan.

Otherwise, any and all such standards adopted by a municipality or county must be consistent with, in accordance with, and not more restrictive than said federal, state, and regional laws, rules, regulations, and orders. Any and all such municipalities or county ordinances, resolutions, orders, or standards contrary to this section shall be null, void, and repealed.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply if a municipality or county, by resolution, requests that the regional solid waste management board or regional solid waste management district for the municipality’s or county’s region adopt a more restrictive rule, regulation, order, or standard and such board or district either fails to hold a public hearing on the request within sixty (60) days of the request, or, after such public hearing, fails to take any action on the request within ninety (90) days of receipt of the request.

If the board or district takes action on the request by approving, modifying, or denying the request within ninety (90) days of its receipt, the municipality or county shall be precluded from adopting and enforcing any more restrictive rule, regulation, order, or standard under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2712; Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate and is at or near the critical point;

“(2)

As of January 1, 1993, the capacity in Arkansas was about four and one-half (4½) years of landfill life for fifty-seven (57) municipal solid waste landfills;

“(3)

By the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991, the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards were established from the preceding Regional Solid Waste Boards and said Regional Solid Waste Boards were given additional powers and duties.

“(4)

The stated purpose for the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 was to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. It was found that the preexisting system of relying upon solid waste management by individual counties and municipalities had fostered conditions in which certain areas of the state were facing capacity shortages of crises proportions, while others experienced a surfeit of capacity with individual disposal facilities which could not muster the resources for environmentally responsible operations. Despite the efforts of the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards to date, those conditions remain true at this time.

“(5)

Upon enacting Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 establishing the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards and providing for their powers and duties, the Seventy-eighth Arkansas General Assembly authorized the districts to issue rules and regulations which are consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, all applicable environmental protection performance standards adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law.

“(6)

Despite the limitation that rules and regulations of the districts be consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, the applicable state and federal law, pursuant to Arkansas Act 237 of 1971, Arkansas Code Annotated § 8-6-209 (Repl.1991), counties and municipalities retain the authority to adopt standards, by ordinance, resolution, or order, for the location, design, construction and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities, that are more restrictive than those adopted by state law and by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

“(7)

This authority vested in counties and municipalities has led in large part to the disparate environmental and economic concerns set out in Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and summarized above and could thwart and jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning.”

In reference to the term “date of passage of this act,” Acts 1993, No. 1280 was signed by the Governor on April 21, 1993, and became effective from and after its passage and approval.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, codified as §§ 8-6-209, 8-6-211, 8-6-212, and 8-6-222.

8-6-210. Agreements authorized.

Any two (2) or more municipalities, counties, or other public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to a solid waste management system.

Any agreement shall specify the following:

Its duration;

The precise organization, composition, and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity created by the agreement, together with the powers delegated thereto, provided that the entity may be legally created;

Its purpose;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget, provided that the legal entity may incur indebtedness for the lease or purchase of land, equipment, and other expenses necessary to the operation of a solid waste management system, or any part of it;

The permissible methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon the partial or complete termination; and

Any other necessary and proper matters.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2704.

8-6-211. Municipal solid waste management systems.

All municipalities shall provide a solid waste management system which will adequately provide for the collection and disposal of all solid wastes generated or existing within the incorporated limits of the municipality or in the area to be served and in accordance with the rules and orders of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission. The governing body of the municipality may enter into agreements with one (1) or more other municipalities, counties, a regional solid waste management district, private persons or trusts, or with any combination thereof, to provide a solid waste management system, or any part of a system, for the municipality, but the agreement shall not relieve the parties of their responsibilities under this subchapter.

The governing body of the municipality shall have the authority to levy and collect such fees and charges and require such licenses as may be appropriate to discharge its responsibility under this subchapter, and the fees, charges, and licenses shall be based on a fee schedule as set forth in an ordinance.

Without limitation on otherwise appropriate collection procedures, a municipality may collect its fees and service charges through either its own system of periodic billing or by entering the fees and service charges on the tax records of the county and then collecting the fees and service charges with the personal property taxes on an annual basis.

Further, any fees and service charges billed periodically by the cities which are more than ninety (90) days delinquent on November 1 of each year may be entered on the tax records of the county as a delinquent periodic fee or service charge and may be collected by the county with personal property taxes.

In counties where the fees are entered on the tax records for yearly collection or if the periodic fees and service charges are more than ninety (90) days delinquent as of November 1, the fees and service charges shall be entered on the tax records of the county by the county clerk and shall be collected by the county collector with the personal property taxes.

The fees and service charges to be collected shall be certified to the county clerk by December 1 each year by an appropriate municipal official or the mayor.

No county collector shall accept payment of any property taxes where annual fees and service charges or delinquent periodic fees and service charges appear on the county tax records of a taxpayer unless the fees and service charges due are also receipted.

These funds shall be receipted and deposited into an official account of the county collector, who shall settle the account at least quarterly.

Annual fees and service charges or the delinquent periodic fees and service charges which remain unpaid after the time other property taxes are due shall constitute a lien on the real and personal property of the taxpayer which may be enforced against such property by an action in circuit court.

The amount of any fees and service charges collected shall then be paid to the municipality by the county collector, less four percent (4%) to be retained by the county collector.

In addition, when the county collector maintains a separate tax book for these fees and charges, the county collector may charge an additional two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for collection.

Municipalities may accept and disburse funds derived from grants from the United States Government or state governments, from private sources, or from moneys that may be appropriated from any available funds for the installation and operation of a solid waste management system or any part of a solid waste management system.

Municipalities are authorized to contract for the purchase of land, facilities, vehicles, and machinery necessary to the installation and operation of a solid waste management system either individually or as a party to a regional or county solid waste authority.

The governing body of a municipality shall have the right to establish policies for and enact laws concerning all phases of the operation of a solid waste management system, including hours of operation, the character and kinds of wastes accepted at the disposal site, the separation of wastes according to type by those generating them prior to collection, the type of container for storage of wastes, the prohibition of the diverting of recyclable materials by persons other than the generator or collector of the recyclable material, the prohibition of burning of wastes, the pretreatment of wastes, and such other rules as may be necessary or appropriate, so long as the laws, policies, and rules are consistent with, in accordance with, and not more restrictive than those adopted by, under, or pursuant to this subchapter or any laws, rules, or orders adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law, the commission, or the regional solid waste management boards or regional solid waste management districts, unless:

There exists a fully implemented comprehensive area-wide zoning plan and corresponding laws or ordinances covering the entire municipality; or

The municipality has made a request to the board or district to adopt a more restrictive rule, order, or standard and no public hearing has been held within sixty (60) days or the request has not been acted upon within ninety (90) days.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2705; Acts 1991, No. 1007, § 1; 1993, No. 1280, § 3; 1995, No. 547, § 4; 2001, No. 1720, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 539, 540.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate and is at or near the critical point;

“(2)

As of January 1, 1993, the capacity in Arkansas was about four and one-half (4½) years of landfill life for fifty-seven (57) municipal solid waste landfills;

“(3)

By the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991, the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards were established from the preceding Regional Solid Waste Boards and said Regional Solid Waste Boards were given additional powers and duties.

“(4)

The stated purpose for the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 was to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. It was found that the preexisting system of relying upon solid waste management by individual counties and municipalities had fostered conditions in which certain areas of the state were facing capacity shortages of crises proportions, while others experienced a surfeit of capacity with individual disposal facilities which could not muster the resources for environmentally responsible operations. Despite the efforts of the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards to date, those conditions remain true at this time.

“(5)

Upon enacting Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 establishing the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards and providing for their powers and duties, the Seventy-eighth Arkansas General Assembly authorized the districts to issue rules and regulations which are consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, all applicable environmental protection performance standards adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law.

“(6)

Despite the limitation that rules and regulations of the districts be consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, the applicable state and federal law, pursuant to Arkansas Act 237 of 1971, Arkansas Code Annotated § 8-6-209 (Repl.1991), counties and municipalities retain the authority to adopt standards, by ordinance, resolution, or order, for the location, design, construction and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities, that are more restrictive than those adopted by state law and by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

“(7)

This authority vested in counties and municipalities has led in large part to the disparate environmental and economic concerns set out in Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and summarized above and could thwart and jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a); and deleted “regulations” following “any laws, rules” in the introductory language of (e).

Cross References.

Theft of recyclable materials, § 5-36-121.

8-6-212. County solid waste management systems.

Each county of the state is authorized to provide and shall provide a solid waste management system adequate to collect and dispose of all solid wastes generated or existing within the boundaries of the county and outside the corporate limits of any municipality in the county.

By agreement or contractual arrangement, the county may assume responsibility for solid wastes generated within municipalities whether within its county or other counties.

A county may enter into agreements with other counties, one (1) or more municipalities, a regional solid waste management district, governmental agencies, private persons, trusts, or with any combination thereof, to provide a solid waste management system for the county or any portion thereof, but the agreement shall not relieve the parties to the agreement of their responsibilities under this subchapter.

A county government may levy and collect the fees and charges and require the licenses that are appropriate to discharge the county's responsibility for a solid waste management system or any portion thereof. Each fee, charge, and license shall be based on a fee schedule contained in an ordinance.

A county may provide by ordinance that responsibility for payment of the fees and charges rests on the occupant of the property.

The ordinance shall provide that the owner of the property is the occupant unless, before the fifth day of the month of service, the owner registers with the county the name and address of the tenant occupying the property and either the date that the lease is to expire or that the lease is month-to-month.

A county government may collect its fees and service charges by using its own system of periodic billing or by entering the fees and service charges on the county tax records and then collecting the fees and service charges annually with the personal property taxes.

If a tenant has been registered as an occupant under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section, then the tenant is responsible for paying the fees and charges, and the county may collect the fees and charges annually from the tenant's personal property taxes.

The county may also assess an additional annual fee of ten percent (10%) for invoicing and collecting the delinquent fees and charges from the tenant rather than the owner.

If a tenant has not been registered as an occupant under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section, then the owner is responsible for paying the fees and charges, and the county may collect the fees and charges annually from the owner's personal property taxes or real property taxes.

Further, a fee or service charge billed periodically by the county that is more than ninety (90) days delinquent or is delinquent as of the date set by the quorum court by ordinance may be entered on the tax records of the county as a delinquent periodic fee or service charge and may be collected by the county with personal property taxes or with real property taxes from the owner of the property in accordance with a county ordinance, except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section.

A county collector shall not accept payment of property taxes if an annual fee or service charge or a delinquent periodic fee or service charge appears on the county tax records of a taxpayer unless the fee or service charge due is also receipted.

These funds shall be receipted and deposited into an official account of the county collector, who shall settle the account at least quarterly.

The amount of the fees and service charges collected shall be paid to the county treasurer by the county collector, less four percent (4%) to be retained by the county collector. In addition, when the county collector maintains a separate tax book for the fees and charges, the county collector may charge an additional two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for collection.

In counties in which the fees are entered on the tax records for yearly collection or if the periodic fees and service charges are more than ninety (90) days delinquent or are delinquent as of the date set by the quorum court by ordinance, the fees and service charges shall be entered on the tax records of the county by the county clerk and shall be collected by the county collector with the personal property taxes or with real property taxes from the owner of the property in accordance with a county ordinance, except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section.

The fees and service charges to be collected shall be certified to the county clerk by December 1 each year by an appropriate municipal official or the mayor.

Annual fees and service charges or the delinquent periodic fees and service charges which remain unpaid after the time other property taxes are due shall constitute a lien on the real and personal property of the taxpayer which may be enforced against such property by an action in circuit court.

A county may accept and disburse funds derived from federal or state grants, from private sources, or from moneys that may be appropriated from any available funds for the installation and operation of a solid waste management system or any part thereof.

A county is authorized to contract for the lease or purchase of land, facilities, and vehicles for the operation of a solid waste management system either for the county or as a party to a regional solid waste authority.

A county shall have the right to issue orders, to establish policies for, and to enact ordinances concerning all phases of the operation of a solid waste management system, including hours of operation, the character and kinds of wastes accepted at the disposal site, the separation of wastes according to type by those generating them prior to collection, the type of container for storage of wastes, the prohibition of the diverting of recyclable materials by persons other than the generator or collector of the recyclable materials, the prohibition of burning of wastes, the pretreatment of wastes, and such other rules as may be necessary or appropriate, so long as such orders, policies, and ordinances are consistent with, in accordance with, and not more restrictive than, those adopted by, under, or pursuant to this subchapter or any other laws, rules, regulations, or orders adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, or the regional solid waste management boards or regional solid waste management districts, unless:

There exists a fully implemented comprehensive area-wide zoning plan and corresponding laws or ordinances covering the entire county; or

The county has made a request to the board or district to adopt a more restrictive rule, regulation, order, or standard and no public hearing has been held within sixty (60) days or the request has not been acted upon within ninety (90) days.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 6; 1983, No. 612, § 1; 1985, No. 946, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2706; Acts 1991, No. 1007, § 2; 1993, No. 1280, § 4; 1995, No. 547, § 5; 2001, No. 1720, § 3; 2005, No. 1272, § 1; 2011, No. 174, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate and is at or near the critical point;

“(2)

As of January 1, 1993, the capacity in Arkansas was about four and one-half (4½) years of landfill life for fifty-seven (57) municipal solid waste landfills;

“(3)

By the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991, the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards were established from the preceding Regional Solid Waste Boards and said Regional Solid Waste Boards were given additional powers and duties.

“(4)

The stated purpose for the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 was to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. It was found that the preexisting system of relying upon solid waste management by individual counties and municipalities had fostered conditions in which certain areas of the state were facing capacity shortages of crises proportions, while others experienced a surfeit of capacity with individual disposal facilities which could not muster the resources for environmentally responsible operations. Despite the efforts of the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards to date, those conditions remain true at this time.

“(5)

Upon enacting Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 establishing the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards and providing for their powers and duties, the Seventy-eighth Arkansas General Assembly authorized the districts to issue rules and regulations which are consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, all applicable environmental protection performance standards adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law.

“(6)

Despite the limitation that rules and regulations of the districts be consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, the applicable state and federal law, pursuant to Arkansas Act 237 of 1971, Arkansas Code Annotated § 8-6-209 (Repl.1991), counties and municipalities retain the authority to adopt standards, by ordinance, resolution, or order, for the location, design, construction and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities, that are more restrictive than those adopted by state law and by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

“(7)

This authority vested in counties and municipalities has led in large part to the disparate environmental and economic concerns set out in Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and summarized above and could thwart and jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b)(1) and (2); and substituted “or are delinquent as of the date set by the quorum court by ordinance” for “as of November 1” in (b)(3).

Cross References.

Theft of recyclable materials, § 5-36-121.

8-6-213. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning permit procedure generally, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 547, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 237, § 8; 1983, No. 916, § 1; 1985, No. 1022, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2708; Acts 1989, No. 531, § 2; 1991, No. 454, § 2.

8-6-214. Records and examinations.

The owner or operator of any permitted facility or site shall establish and maintain such records, make such reports, install, use, and maintain such monitoring equipment or methods, take such samples, perform such tests, and provide such other information to the Division of Environmental Quality as the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may reasonably require.

The division or any authorized employee or agent may examine and copy any books, papers, records, or memoranda pertaining to the operation of the facility or site.

The division or any authorized employee or agent may enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations necessary or appropriate for the purpose of this subchapter.

Any records, reports, or information obtained under this subchapter and any permits, permit applications, and related documentation shall be available to the public for inspection and copying.

Upon a satisfactory showing to the director that the records, reports, permits, documentation, or information, or any part thereof, if made public, would divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as trade secrets, then the director shall consider, treat, and protect such records, reports, or information as confidential.

As necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, information afforded confidential treatment may be transmitted under a continuing restriction of confidentiality to other officers, employees, or authorized representatives of this state or of the United States if the owner or operator of the facility to which the information pertains is informed at least two (2) weeks prior to the transmittal and if the information has been acquired by the division under the provisions of this subchapter.

The provisions of this subdivision (d)(2) shall not be construed to limit the division's authority to release confidential information during emergency situations.

Any violation of this subsection shall be unlawful and constitute a misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 9; 1983, No. 666, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2709; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 63; 2019, No. 910, § 2608.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and made similar changes throughout the section.

8-6-215 — 8-6-217. [Superseded.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

These sections, concerning transfer of permits, financial responsibility, and denial of application for issuance, transfer, or modification of permit, are deemed to be superseded by § 8-1-106, derived from Acts 1991, No. 454, § 1. These sections were derived from the following sources:

8-6-215. Acts 1989, No. 531, § 1.

8-6-216. Acts 1989, No. 531, § 1.

8-6-217. Acts 1989, No. 531, § 1.

8-6-218. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning limitations on the issuance of permits for new landfills, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 993, § 1.

For current law, see § 8-6-1501 et seq.

8-6-219. Applicants for permits — Applicability.

An applicant for a new permit under this subchapter or the modification or transfer of a permit shall be a person, partnership, corporation, association, the State of Arkansas, a political subdivision of the state, an improvement district, a sanitation authority, or a solid waste board.

This section shall not apply to permits for landfills where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character.

[Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1991, No. 751, § 4; 2019, No. 693, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (c).